West Virginia, session 2026, HB5420.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 18. EDUCATION. ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-9c. Logic for Living curriculum for grades seven through ten. (a) Findings and purpose. — The Legislature finds that the ability to reason logically, identify fallacies, construct sound arguments, and evaluate evidence is essential for informed citizenship, critical thinking, and success in higher education, the workforce, and general life. The purpose of the Logic for Living curriculum is to ensure that students taught in public schools receive instruction in the process of clear thinking. This instruction will enhance their ability to evaluate academic materials, effectively communicate orally and in writing, and engage in meaningful dialogue in every facet of life, from civic involvement to vocation and beyond. This instruction will better prepare adolescents to approach adulthood with competence and confidence. As a result, society in West Virginia will benefit in innumerable ways.(b) The Washington Center for Civics, Culture, and Statesmanship at West Virginia University (hereinafter referred to as the "Center") shall assess the West Virginia College and Career Readiness Standards for grades seven through ten and identify areas of improvement with regard to the instruction of logic and reasoning, with a special emphasis  on the identification, production, and evaluation of arguments. Instruction includes clarifying claims (e.g. addressing ambiguity and vagueness), distinguishing premises from conclusions, identifying unstated assumptions (enthymemes), recognizing and avoiding common mistakes in reasoning (both formal and informal fallacies), understanding and utilizing conditional claims and reasoning ( “if, then” and “only if”), testing and refining universal claims and principles through counterexamples.(c) The Center shall develop standards, curriculum, instructional materials, and assessments to facilitate developmentally appropriate instruction in logic in grades seven through ten. Logic for Living courses shall incorporate an interdisciplinary, cross-curricular approach, taking into consideration the application of logic toward claims and scenarios from social studies, science, literature and language, math, and other disciplines, as well as common scenarios and dilemmas encountered by adolescents and young adults.(d) For purposes of this section, "Logic for Living" means the study of everyday reasoning, including but not limited to: identifying and analyzing arguments; recognizing common logical fallacies (such as ad hominem, straw man, false dilemma, and appeal to emotion); distinguishing between deductive and inductive reasoning; evaluating evidence and sources; constructing valid and sound arguments; applying these skills to real-world issues and discourse; and emphasizing informal logic elements such as enthymemes, syllogisms, and types of fallacies.(e) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, public schools in selected counties shall provide instruction in Logic for Living to students in grades seven through ten as a dedicated semester-long course in each grade, with age-appropriate content aligned with the standards developed by the Center.(f) Phased implementation. — The Center shall identify an initial ten counties to implement the Logic for Living training and instruction, followed by an additional twenty counties for the following year, and twenty-five counties for the last year of the rollout period. The first phase of training for teacher endorsements and instructional courses shall be prepared for offering in the initial ten counties by the start of the 2028-2029 school year. An additional twenty counties shall be trained and ready to offer the course for the 2029-2030 school year, and the final twenty-five counties for the 2031-2032 school year.(g) Teacher training and endorsements. —(1) The Center shall develop a plan to train certified teachers toward obtaining an endorsement in logic, with a separate endorsement for levels seven through eight and nine through ten. The plan must not place significant additional financial or compliance burden on counties. The plan should prioritize existing professional development opportunities in county schedules. Counties shall prioritize the logic training over other types of professional development or required state policy training not directly related to student safety. When necessary, waivers shall be granted to counties when conflicts arise with requirements for other state-required trainings.(2) Teacher training shall be offered directly to counties through the most effective and efficient means as determined by the Center. Counties shall assess the numbers of teachers needed to obtain the endorsement in order to be prepared to offer the Logic for Living class. Counties shall consider how best to incorporate course requirements into existing school schedules. The Center shall be available for consultation regarding implementation and scheduling of courses within schools.(3) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, any teacher assigned to provide instruction in Logic for Living under this section must hold a valid endorsement in logic for the appropriate grade levels, as issued by the State Board of Education in compliance with the criteria set by the Center.(4) The Center shall develop and implement a training program for teachers, which may include online modules, workshops, or partnerships with institutions of higher education. Endorsement shall be granted upon successful completion of the training program and passage of a competency assessment. Endorsements shall be valid for five years and renewable through continuing education credits or re-assessment.(5) County boards of education shall ensure compliance with these requirements and may provide incentives or support for teachers to obtain endorsements.(6) The Center is authorized to offer stipends or other incentives to teachers who successfully obtain the endorsement.(h) Reporting. — The Center shall report to the Joint Standing Committee on Education no later than September 30, 2026, with initial plans for implementation. The Center shall report to the Joint Standing Committee on Education no less than twice per year concerning the status of the plan to implement the Logic for Living courses.(i) The State Board of Education shall, on or before July 1, 2027, consult with the Center to promulgate guidelines for legislative approval concerning the implementation of this section, including the addition of Logic for Living standards to existing college and career readiness standards. (j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the integration of Logic for Living principles into other courses beyond the required dedicated semester courses.(k) This section shall be effective from passage. CHAPTER 18A. SCHOOL PERSONNEL. ARTICLE 3. TRAINING, CERTIFICATION, LICENSING, PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. §18A-3-2a. Certificates valid in the public schools that may be issued by the State Superintendent. In accordance with state board rules for the education of professional educators adopted pursuant to §18A-3-1 of this code and subject to the limitations and conditions of that section, the State Superintendent may issue the following certificates valid in the public schools of the state:(a) Professional teaching certificates. —(1) A professional teaching certificate for teaching in the public schools may be issued to a person who meets the following conditions: (A) Holds at least a bachelor’s degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, and:(i) Has passed appropriate state board approved basic skills and subject matter tests in the area for which licensure is being sought; and(ii) Has completed a program for the education of teachers which meets the requirements approved by the state board; or(iii) Has met equivalent standards at institutions in other states; or(iv) Has completed three years of successful teaching experience within the last seven years under a license issued by another state in the area for which licensure is being sought; or(v) Has completed an alternative program approved by another state; or(B) Holds at least a bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution of higher education, and:(i) Has passed appropriate state board approved basic skills and subject matter tests; and(ii) Has completed an alternative program for teacher education as provided in this article; and(iii) Is recommended for a certificate in accordance with the provisions of §18A-3-1i of this code relating to the program; and(iv) Is recommended by the State Superintendent based on documentation submitted; or(C) Holds a bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution of higher education, and: (i) Submits to a criminal history check pursuant to §18A-3-10 of this code: Provided, That information discovered during the criminal history check may form the basis for the denial of a certificate for just cause; and(ii) Successfully completes pedagogical training or a pedagogical course or courses in substantive alignment with nationally recognized pedagogical standards, or approved or established by the state board; and (iii) Passes the same subject matter and competency test or tests required by the state board for traditional program applicants for licensure or;(D) Is an honorably discharged member of the armed forces who:(i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree from an accredited institution of higher education that is related to the available position which the veteran has applied to; and(ii) Has passed the basic skills and subject matter test or tests required by the state board for teachers to become certified in the area for which the licensure is sought; and(iiii) Is exempt from any additional teacher certification requirements except the criminal history check required by §18A-3-10 of this code.(2) The certificate shall be endorsed to indicate the grade level or levels or areas of specialization in which the person is certified to teach or to serve in the public schools, including endorsements in logic as provided in §18-2-9b of this code.(3) The initial professional certificate is issued provisionally for a period of three years from the date of issuance:(A) The certificate may be converted to a professional certificate valid for five years subject to successful completion of a beginning teacher induction program, if applicable; or(B) The certificate may be renewed subject to rules adopted by the state board.(4) Teaching certificates granted pursuant to §18A-3-2a(a)(1)(C) of this code shall be equivalent to certificates granted to graduates of teacher preparation programs at public higher education institutions.(C) This section shall be effective from passage.(b) Alternative program teacher certificate. — An alternative program teacher certificate may be issued to a candidate who is enrolled in an alternative program for teacher education approved by the state board.(1) The certificate is valid only for the alternative program position in which the candidate is employed and is subject to enrollment in the program.(2) The certificate is valid while the candidate is enrolled in the alternative program, up to a maximum of three years, and may not be renewed.(c) Professional administrative certificate. —(1) A professional administrative certificate, endorsed for serving in the public schools, with specific endorsement as a principal, vocational administrator, supervisor of instructions, or superintendent, may be issued to a person who has completed requirements all to be approved by the state board as follows:(A) Holds at least a master’s degree from an institution of higher education accredited to offer a master’s degree, and:(i) Has successfully completed an approved program for administrative certification developed by the state board in cooperation with the chancellor for higher education; and(ii) Has successfully completed education and training in evaluation skills through the Center for Professional Development, or equivalent education and training in evaluation skills approved by the state board; and(iii) Possesses three years of management level experience.(2) Any person serving in the position of dean of students on June 4, 1992, is not required to hold a professional administrative certificate.(3) The initial professional administrative certificate is issued provisionally for a period of five years. This certificate may be converted to a professional administrative certificate valid for five years or renewed, subject to the regulations of the state board.(d) Paraprofessional certificate. — A paraprofessional certificate may be issued to a person who meets the following conditions:(1) Has completed 36 semester hours of post-secondary education or its equivalent in subjects directly related to performance of the job, all approved by the state board; and(2) Demonstrates the proficiencies to perform duties as required of a paraprofessional as defined in §18A-4-8 of this code.(e) Other certificates; permits. —(1) Other certificates and permits may be issued, subject to the approval of the state board, to persons who do not qualify for the professional or paraprofessional certificate.(2) A certificate or permit may not be given permanent status and a person holding one of these credentials shall meet renewal requirements provided by law and by regulation, unless the state board declares certain of these certificates to be the equivalent of the professional certificate.(3) Within the category of other certificates and permits, the State Superintendent may issue certificates for persons to serve in the public schools as athletic coaches or coaches of other extracurricular activities, whose duties may include the supervision of students, subject to the following limitations:(A) The person is employed under a contract with the county board of education.(i) The contract specifies the duties to be performed, specifies a rate of pay that is equivalent to the rate of pay for professional educators in the district who accept similar duties as extra duty assignments, and provides for liability insurance associated with the activity; and(ii) The person holding this certificate is not considered an employee of the board for salary and benefit purposes other than as specified in the contract.(B) The person completes an orientation program designed and approved in accordance with state board rules.(f) Clinical Teacher of Record Permit. —(1) A clinical teacher of record permit may be issued to a candidate who is enrolled in a clinical teacher of record program in accordance with an agreement between an institution of higher education and a county board. The agreement is developed pursuant to §18A-3-1(e) of this code and requires approval by the state board.(2) The permit is valid only for the clinical teacher of record program position in which the candidate is enrolled and is subject to enrollment in the program. The permit is valid for no more than one school year and may not be renewed.(g) Temporary teaching certificates for armed forces spouses. — (1) A temporary teaching certificate for an armed forces spouse may be issued to an individual who meets the following criteria:(A) He or she is married to a member of the armed forces of the United States who is on active duty;(B) He or she holds a current unencumbered teaching certificate or license issued by an equivalent credentialing department, board, or authority, as determined by the State Superintendent, in another state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, another territory or protectorate of the United States or a foreign country; and(C) He or she provides proof acceptable to the State Superintendent that his or her spouse is assigned to a duty station in this state or at a military installation within 50 air miles of the West Virginia border and that he or she is also assigned to a duty station in this state or at a military installation within 50 air miles of the West Virginia border under his or her spouse’s official active duty military orders.(2) The State Superintendent shall deny a temporary teaching certificate to an individual described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision for fraud, material misrepresentation or concealment in the person’s application for a temporary teaching certificate or for a conviction for which an individual’s teaching certificate may be revoked under §18A-3-6 of this code.(3) A temporary teaching certificate issued under paragraph (1) of this subdivision is valid for one year and may be renewed for additional one-year terms if the State Superintendent determines the individual holding the temporary teaching certificate continues to meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subdivision. The State Superintendent may revoke a temporary teaching certificate for a conviction for which an individual’s teaching certificate may be revoked under §18A-3-6 of this code.(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)(3)(B) of this section, teachers with a bachelor’s degree and 10 years teaching experience, with a valid teaching certificate, in good standing, without any unsatisfactory evaluations will be able to apply for and receive a permanent teaching certificate in West Virginia without having to take any additional course work. This subsection shall be effective from passage.